Maryland, session 2026, SB0749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0749*

SENATE BILL 749
Article – Public Utilities
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(DD–1) (1) “RESIDENTIAL RETAIL CUSTOMER” MEANS A RETAIL
ELECTRIC OR RETAIL GAS CUSTOMER THAT PURCHASES ELECTRICITY OR GAS FOR
USE AT A DOMICILE, INCLUDING ANY INDIVIDUAL THAT ENTERS INTO A DIRECT
CONTRACT WITH AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER OR GAS SUPPLIER FOR THE PROVISION
OF ELECTRICITY OR GAS FOR USE AT A DOMICILE.
(2) “RESIDENTIAL RETAIL CUSTOMER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A RETAIL
CUSTOMER WHOSE ACCOUNT SERVES THE PRIMARY BUSINESS OPERATIONS,
ANCILLARY BUSINESS FUNCTIONS, OR COMMERCIAL ACTIVITIES OF A BUSINESS
ENTITY OR OTHER NONRESIDENTIAL ORGANIZATION BUT IS CLASSIFIED,
DESIGNATED, OR OTHERWISE CODED AS RESIDENTIAL BY THE ELECTRIC OR GAS
COMPANY.
7–510.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to residential electricity supply other than
supply offered through:
(i) standard offer service;
(ii) the Department of General Services’ sale of energy under §
7–704.4 of this title; or
(iii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this subtitle.
(2) A residential electricity supplier:
(i) may offer electricity, other than green power, only at a price that
does not exceed the [trailing 12–month average of the] electric company’s standard offer
service rate in the electric company’s service territory as of the date of agreement with the
customer;
(ii) may offer residential electricity supply only for a term not to
exceed 12 months at a time;
(iii) may, for electricity supply other than green power, automatically
renew the term only if the electricity supplier provides notice to the customer 90 days before
and 30 days before renewal;

SENATE BILL 749 3
(iv) may offer green power that meets the requirements of § 7–707 of
this title, but may not automatically renew the term with the customer;
(v) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, may not offer a
variable rate other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal variation not more than twice in a
single year; [and]
(vi) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based
compensation to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers; AND
(VII) MAY USE CONSOLIDATED BILLING.
(3) Paragraph (2)(v) of this subsection does not prohibit the offer and use
of time–of–use rates that establish different rates for periods within a single day.
(4) A residential electricity supplier may not sell to an electric company,
and an electric company may not purchase from the electricity supplier, accounts
receivable.
7–707.
(a) In this section, “green power” means energy sources or renewable energy
credits that are marketed as clean, green, eco–friendly, environmentally friendly or
responsible, carbon–free, renewable, 100% renewable, 100% wind, 100% hydro, 100% solar,
100% emission–free, or similar claims.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) the Department of General Services when the Department of General
Services sells energy under § 7–704.4 of this subtitle;
(2) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this title; or
(3) an electricity supplier when supplying electricity to commercial retail
electric customers.
(c) An electricity supplier that supplies electricity to residential retail electric
customers may not market electricity as green power unless:
(1) the percentage of the electricity being offered, or the equivalent number
of renewable energy credits associated with the electricity being marketed as green power,
that is eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard equals or
exceeds the greater of:
(i) 51%; or

SENATE BILL 749
(ii) 1% higher than the renewable energy portfolio standard for the
year the electricity is provided to the customer;
(2) the Commission approves the price of the electricity being marketed as
green power in accordance with subsection (d) of this section; and
(3) the electricity supplier submits an application to the Commission that:
(i) describes the electricity being marketed as green power,
including the green power source and percentage of the electricity that is green power;
(ii) describes how the green power complies with State law and
regulations; and
(iii) includes any other information the Commission considers
necessary.
(d) (1) The price approved by the Commission under subsection (c)(2) of this
section shall be determined through:
(i) a proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (2) of this
subsection; or
(ii) a proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
(2) (i) Each year the Commission shall hold a proceeding to set a price
per megawatt–hour for electricity marketed as green power under this section that may
not be exceeded by an electricity supplier except as provided in paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
(ii) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, the price set by the
Commission under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may:
1. exceed the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is
authorized under § 7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title; and
2. differ based on the amount and source of the electricity
generation.
(iii) During a proceeding held under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, the Commission:
1. shall consider:
A. the price of the energy purchased, including the total cost
of the renewable energy credits;

SENATE BILL 749 5
B. the amount of electricity that is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard; AND
C. [the state in which the electricity was generated; and
D.] applicable market data; and
2. may consider whether the purchase of renewable energy
credits was bundled with a power purchase agreement from the energy sources associated
with the credit.
(3) (i) On request by an electricity supplier, the Commission shall hold
a proceeding to set a price per megawatt–hour for electricity marketed as green power for
that electricity supplier.
(ii) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, at a proceeding held
under this paragraph the Commission may set a price per megawatt–hour that is higher
than the price determined in the proceeding held under paragraph (2) of this subsection for
an electricity supplier if:
1. the electricity supplier demonstrates to the Commission’s
satisfaction, based on an independent third–party audit, that the actual cost to the
electricity supplier for the generation or supply of electricity exceeds that of the price
determined through the proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (2) of this
subsection;
2. the increased price reflects only the cost of the electricity
marketed as green power and is not associated with any of the electricity supplier’s other
costs; and
3. the electricity supplier demonstrates to the Commission’s
satisfaction that the electricity supplier has a significant long–term investment in
renewable energy that meets the renewable energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this
subtitle.
(iii) During a proceeding held under this paragraph, the Commission
shall consider:
1. whether the purchase of renewable energy credits was
bundled with a power purchase agreement from the energy sources associated with the
credit;
2. the price of the energy purchased, including the total cost
of the renewable energy credits or power purchase agreements;

SENATE BILL 749
3. the amount of electricity that is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the renewable energy portfolio standard; AND
4. [the state in which the electricity was generated; and
5.] applicable market data.
(4) (i) A price approved by the Commission under this subsection may
not exceed 150% of the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is authorized under §
7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title unless the Commission determines that the actual cost of the
green power exceeds that amount.
(ii) Within 120 days after approving a price for green power that
exceeds 150% of the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is authorized under §
7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title, and annually for as long as the price exceeds that amount, the
Commission shall submit a report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, that:
1. demonstrates that the approved price represents only the
actual price of the green power; and
2. includes the Commission’s order authorizing the price of
the green power.
(iii) If the Commission has approved for 3 consecutive years a price
for green power that exceeds 150% of the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is
authorized under § 7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title, the Commission shall include in the annual
report required under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph:
1. information on market conditions that necessitate the
approved price of the green power that exceeds 150% of the maximum price per
megawatt–hour that is authorized under § 7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title; and
2. a recommendation of whether to increase the limitation on
the maximum price of green power above which the Commission is required to make a
determination under this paragraph.
(5) The Commission:
(i) shall annually review a price approved under paragraph (3) of
this subsection; and
(ii) may, on its own initiative, or on petition by the Office of People’s
Counsel, require an electricity supplier offering green power under a price established
under paragraph (3) of this subsection to demonstrate that the price continues to meet the
requirements of paragraph (3) of this subsection.

SENATE BILL 749 7
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.